Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 3

Service of Process on and Testimony of Inmates

41-21-301. Process in civil actions.

Process in a civil action against an inmate in the penitentiary may be served by the proper officer, in the presence of the warden or the assistant warden, and returned as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 5549; Shan., § 7571; Code 1932, § 12169; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-601.

Cross-References. Bills in chancery, process, title 21, ch. 1, part 2.

Civil procedure, process, title 20, ch. 2.

Service of process, courts of general sessions, title 16, ch. 15, part 9.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-302. Right to counsel.

If a bill or petition is filed against an inmate in any court having jurisdiction, or any interrogatories propounded to the inmate as a party to the suit, that require to be answered, the inmate may be allowed the aid of counsel to prepare an answer.

Code 1858, § 5550; Shan., § 7572; Code 1932, § 12170; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-602.

41-21-303. Return on failure to answer.

If the inmate declines to answer the bill, petition or interrogatories after they have been read over and explained by the officer executing them, in the presence of the warden or the assistant warden, the officer may make the return accordingly, whereupon the bill, petition or interrogatories, so far as the inmate is concerned, shall be taken for confessed as true and proceedings had as usual in such cases.

Code 1858, § 5551; Shan., § 7573; Code 1932, § 12171; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-603.

41-21-304. Depositions.

In no civil case can an inmate be removed from the penitentiary to give personal attendance at court, but testimony may be taken by deposition, as in other cases, the party seeking the testimony being required to make affidavit that the inmate is a material witness in the cause.

The defendant in a state prosecution may, in like manner, take the testimony of a inmate in the defendant's behalf, notice being given to the district attorney general of the time of taking the deposition.

Code 1858, §§ 5552, 5553 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 38, § 33); Shan., §§ 7574, 7575; Code 1932, §§ 12172, 12173; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-604, 41-605.

41-21-305. Writ for appearance to testify in criminal case.

Whenever the presiding judge of any court has reason to believe that the evidence of an inmate is necessary in any criminal proceedings and that other evidence cannot be obtained on behalf of the state or of the defendant, the presiding judge shall order a writ to be issued directing the warden of the penitentiary to bring the body of the inmate before the court, on a day to be named in the writ, to give testimony for the state or for the defendant in such case.

Code 1858, § 5554; Shan., § 7576; Code 1932, § 12174; Acts 1965, ch. 81, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-606.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

41-21-306. Warden's duty to produce witness.

It is the duty of the warden, upon the service of the writ provided for in § 41-21-305, to have the inmate before the court on the day specified, for which purpose the warden may employ a trustworthy deputy and a sufficient guard, who are entitled to the same compensation for each day's travel and attendance on court as is allowed sheriffs and guards for the removal of inmates to the penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5555; Shan., § 7577; Code 1932, § 12175; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-607.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

41-21-307. Warden's powers in removing inmates to and from court.

The warden of the penitentiary, in removing inmates to and from the penitentiary under an order of court, has the same power as the sheriff in removing inmates to the penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5548; Shan., § 7570; mod. Code 1932, § 12168; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-608.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

Sheriff's powers on removal, §§ 40-23-108 — 40-23-110.

41-21-308. Keeping prisoner in jail en route.

The sheriff or jailer of the county in which the court is held, or of any county through which the inmate is required to pass, shall receive and safely keep the inmate in the county jail, during travel and attendance, if required to do so by the persons in charge of the inmate, for which they shall be allowed the legal charge for keeping inmates.

Code 1858, § 5556; Shan., § 7578; Code 1932, § 12176; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-609.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

41-21-309. Return to penitentiary after testifying.

When an inmate has testified, the deputy and guard shall return the inmate to the penitentiary with all convenient speed.

Code 1858, § 5557; Shan., § 7579; Code 1932, § 12177; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-610.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.

41-21-310. Liability for escape en route.

The inmate, deputy and guard, in going from and to the penitentiary, and while remaining at the court, are respectively liable for an escape or attempt to escape under part 4 of this chapter, §§ 39-12-103, 39-13-304, 39-16-201, 39-16-402, 39-16-403, and title 39, chapter 16, part 6, in the same manner as they would have been if the inmate were in the penitentiary under their custody.

Code 1858, § 5558; Shan., § 7580; Code 1932, § 12178; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-611; Acts 1996, ch. 675, § 41.

Cross-References. Federal prisoner as witness in state criminal proceedings, § 40-17-212.

Prisoner as witness in criminal proceedings outside state in which incarcerated, § 40-17-211.